Oklahoma, session 2025, SB432.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 11 O.S. 2021, Section 49-101, as

amended by Section 3, Chapter 232, O.S.L. 2022 (11 O.S. Supp. 2024,

Section 49-101), is amended to read as follows:

Section 49-101. A. All retired volunteer firefighters who

qualify for retirement shall be entitled to a monthly pension. The

monthly pension of a volunteer firefighter who retires prior to the

effective date of this act shall be in the amount retired volunteer

firefighters are receiving at the time the volunteer firefighter

Req. No. 354 Page 1

RBS No. 354
begi ns to receive a pension for each year of credited service not to

exceed thirty (30) years. Volunteer firefighters who retire on and

after the effective date of this act shall receive a monthly pension

in the amount of Ten Dollars ($10.00) for each year of credited

service not to exceed thirty (30) years. In determining the number

of years of credited service, a fractional year of six (6) months or

more shall be counted as one (1) full year and a fractional year of

less than six (6) months shall not be counted in such determination.

Retired volunteer firefighters of a municipality shall receive a

pension of not less than that which retired volunteer firefighters

of such municipality were receiving on June 30, 1985.

B. A volunteer firefighter who terminates service after

completing ten (10) years of credited service, but less than twenty

(20) years of credited service, shall be entitled to receive a

vested benefit commencing on the date the firefighter reaches fifty

(50) years of age or the date the firefighter would have had twenty

(20) years of credited service had the firefighter’s service

continued uninterrupted, whichever is later. The monthly amount of

such retirement benefit shall be the amount being paid to volunteer

firefighters at the time the member vests multiplied by the number

of years of credited service. Credited service must be established

at the time of the volunteer firefighter’s termination. If a

volunteer firefighter who terminated employment and elected, or was

eligible to elect, a vested benefit dies prior to being eligible to

Req. No. 354 Page 2

RBS No. 354
rece ive benefits, the volunteer firefighter’s beneficiary, as

defined in paragraph 16 of Section 49-100.1 of this title, shall be

entitled to the volunteer firefighter’s normal monthly retirement

benefit on the date the deceased volunteer firefighter would have

been eligible to receive the benefit.

SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 11 O.S. 2021, Section 49-101.2, as

amended by Section 4, Chapter 232, O.S.L. 2022 (11 O.S. Supp. 2024,

Section 49-101.2), is amended to read as follows:

Section 49-101.2. Any member serving as an active volunteer

firefighter who receives annual compensation from the fire

department the firefighter is enrolled in as a member of the

Oklahoma Firefighters Pension and Retirement System for services

related to firefighting, other than reimbursement of expenses in

excess of five and one-half (5 1/2) times the annual pension benefit

paid by the System to a retired volunteer firefighter with twenty

(20) years credited service Nine Thousand Nine Hundred Thirty-nine

Dollars and sixty-nine cents ($9,939.69), shall be considered a paid

firefighter and must meet the physical and agility requirements

pursuant to Section 49-116 of this title to continue as an active

member of the System. Credited service earned as a paid firefighter

pursuant to this section shall not be considered actual experience

as a paid firefighter for purposes of meeting the qualifications of

a paid fire chief as provided in Section 29-102 of this title. No

fire department of a participating municipality shall employ a

Req. No. 354 Page 3

RBS No. 354
volu nteer firefighter from another fire department to perform

services relating to firefighting for any compensation of any kind.

SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 3103, as

last amended by Section 127, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (62 O.S. Supp.

2024, Section 3103), is amended to read as follows:

Section 3103. As used in the Oklahoma Pension Legislation

Actuarial Analysis Act:

1. “Amendment” means any amendment including a substitute bill,

made to a retirement bill by any committee of the House of

Representatives or Senate, any conference committee of the House or

Senate or by the House or Senate;

2. “RB number” means that number preceded by the letters “RB”

assigned to a retirement bill by the respective staffs of the

Oklahoma State Senate and the Oklahoma House of Representatives when

the respective staff office prepares a retirement bill for a member

of the Legislature;

3. “Legislative Actuary” means the firm or entity that enters

into a contract with the Legislative Service Bureau pursuant to

Section 452.15 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes to provide the

actuarial services and other duties provided for in the Oklahoma

Pension Legislation Actuarial Analysis Act;

4. “Nonfiscal amendment” means an amendment to a retirement

bill having a fiscal impact, which amendment does not change any



Req. No. 354 Page 4

RBS No. 354
fact or of an actuarial investigation specified in subsection A of

Section 3109 of this title;

5. “Nonfiscal retirement bill” means a retirement bill:

a. which does not affect the cost or funding factors of a

retirement system,

b. which affects such factors only in a manner which does

not:

(1) grant a benefit increase under the retirement

system affected by the bill,

(2) create an actuarial accrued liability for or

increase the actuarial accrued liability of the

retirement system affected by the bill, or

(3) increase the normal cost of the retirement system

affected by the bill,

c. which authorizes the purchase by an active member of

the retirement system, at the actuarial cost for the

purchase as computed pursuant to the statute in effect

on the effective date of the measure allowing such

purchase, of years of service for purposes of reaching

a normal retirement date in the applicable retirement

system, but which cannot be used in order to compute

the number of years of service for purposes of

computing the retirement benefit for the member,



Req. No. 354 Page 5

RBS No. 354
d. which provides for the computation of a service-

connected disability retirement benefit for members of

the Oklahoma Law Enforcement Retirement System

pursuant to Section 2-305 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma

Statutes if the members were unable to complete twenty

(20) years of service as a result of the disability,

e. which requires membership in the defined benefit plan

authorized by Section 901 et seq. of Title 74 of the

Oklahoma Statutes for persons whose first elected or

appointed service occurs on or after November 1, 2018,

if such persons had any prior service in the Oklahoma

Public Employees Retirement System prior to November

1, 2015,

f. which provides for a one-time increase in retirement

benefits if the increase in retirement benefits is not

a permanent increase in the gross annual retirement

benefit payable to a member or beneficiary, occurs

only once pursuant to a single statutory authorization

and does not exceed:

(1) the lesser of two percent (2%) of the gross

annual retirement benefit of the member or One

Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) and requires that

the benefit may only be provided if the funded

ratio of the affected retirement system would not

Req. No. 354 Page 6

RBS No. 354
be less than sixty percent (60%) but not greater

than eighty percent (80%) after the benefit

increase is paid,

(2) the lesser of two percent (2%) of the gross

annual retirement benefit of the member or One

Thousand Two Hundred Dollars ($1,200.00) and

requires that the benefit may only be provided if

the funded ratio of the affected retirement

system would be greater than eighty percent (80%)

but not greater than one hundred percent (100%)

after the benefit increase is paid,

(3) the lesser of two percent (2%) of the gross

annual retirement benefit of the member or One

Thousand Four Hundred Dollars ($1,400.00) and

requires that the benefit may only be provided if

the funded ratio of the affected retirement

system would be greater than one hundred percent

(100%) after the benefit increase is paid, or

(4) the greater of two percent (2%) of the gross

annual retirement benefit of the volunteer

firefighter or One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for

persons who retired from the Oklahoma

Firefighters Pension and Retirement System as

volunteer firefighters and who did not retire

Req. No. 354 Page 7

RBS No. 354
from the Oklahoma Firefighters Pension and

Retirement System as a paid firefighter.

As used in this subparagraph, “funded ratio” means the

figure derived by dividing the actuarial value of

assets of the applicable retirement system by the

actuarial accrued liability of the applicable

retirement system,

g. which modifies the disability pension standard for

police officers who are members of the Oklahoma Police

Pension and Retirement System as provided by Section

50-115 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes,

h. which provides a cost-of-living benefit increase

pursuant to the provisions of:

(1) Section 49-143.7 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma

Statutes,

(2) Section 50-136.9 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma

Statutes,

(3) Section 1104K of Title 20 of the Oklahoma

Statutes,

(4) Section 2-305.12 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma

Statutes,

(5) Section 17-116.22 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma

Statutes, or



Req. No. 354 Page 8

RBS No. 354
(6) Section 930.11 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma

Statutes,

i. which provides for the reinstatement of retirement

benefits for members of the Oklahoma Law Enforcement

Retirement System pursuant to Section 2-305 of Title

47 of the Oklahoma Statutes for those who were hired

on or after November 1, 2012, or May 24, 2013,

j. which authorizes the purchase of military service

credit as provided in Section 50-128 of Title 11,

Section 1102.2 of Title 20, Section 2-307.4 of Title

47, and Section 913.8 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma

Statutes,

k. which restores benefits pursuant to Sections 49-100.1,

49-101, 49-101.2, 49-106.1, 49-108, 49-117.1, and 49-

135 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes,

l. which modifies the computation of the line-of-duty

disability benefit pursuant to the provisions of this

act Sections 50-101 and 50-115 of Title 11 of the

Oklahoma Statutes, or

m. which provides for a benefits increase for volunteer

firefighters pursuant to Sections 49-101 and 49-101.2

of Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes.

A nonfiscal retirement bill shall include any retirement bill that

has as its sole purpose the appropriation or distribution or

Req. No. 354 Page 9

RBS No. 354
redi stribution of monies in some manner to a retirement system for

purposes of reducing the unfunded liability of such system or the

earmarking of a portion of the revenue from a tax to a retirement

system or increasing the percentage of the revenue earmarked from a

tax to a retirement system;

6. “Reduction-in-cost amendment” means an amendment to a

retirement bill having a fiscal impact which reduces the cost of the

bill as such cost is determined by the actuarial investigation for

the bill prepared pursuant to Section 3109 of this title;

7. “Retirement bill” means any bill or joint resolution

introduced or any bill or joint resolution amended by a member of

the Oklahoma Legislature which creates or amends any law directly

affecting a retirement system. A retirement bill shall not mean a

bill or resolution that impacts the revenue of any state tax in

which a portion of the revenue generated from such tax is earmarked

for the benefit of a retirement system;

8. “Retirement bill having a fiscal impact” means any

retirement bill creating or establishing a retirement system and any

other retirement bill other than a nonfiscal retirement bill; and

9. “Retirement system” means the Teachers’ Retirement System of

Oklahoma, the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System, the

Uniform Retirement System for Justices and Judges, the Oklahoma

Firefighters Pension and Retirement System, the Oklahoma Police

Pension and Retirement System, the Oklahoma Law Enforcement

Req. No. 354 Page 10

RBS No. 354
Reti rement System, or a retirement system established after January

1, 2006.

SECTION 4. Sections 1 and 2 of this act shall become effective

in accordance with the provisions of Section 58 of Article V of the

Oklahoma Constitution.

SECTION 5. Section 3 of this act shall become effective July 1,

2025.

SECTION 6. It being immediately necessary for the preservation

of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and

be in full force from and after its passage and approval.



60-1-354 RD 1/14/2025 3:51:22 PM























Req. No. 354 Page 11